Hawaii statutes.
§461J-4 Board of physical therapy;
establishment, appointment, membership. (a) There is established within
the department of commerce and consumer affairs for administrative purposes the
board of physical therapy. The board shall consist of seven members. Four
members shall be physical therapists, one member shall be a physical therapist
assistant, and two members shall be consumers. All members shall be at least
eighteen years of age and residents of the State.

(b) Each physical therapist member of the
board shall possess a valid permanent license as a physical therapist and shall
have, after graduation from a school of physical therapy, at least three years
of full-time experience or the equivalent in any of the following areas or in
any combination of the following: clinical physical therapy services,
administration in physical therapy or related health fields, or teaching in an
educational program to prepare practitioners of physical therapy.

(c) The physical therapist assistant member of
the board shall possess a valid permanent license as a physical therapist
assistant and shall have, after graduation from an accredited physical
therapist assistant program or an accredited physical therapy program, at least
three years of full-time experience.

(d) The governor may appoint and fill each
vacancy on the board pursuant to section 26-34. [L 1985, c 276, pt of §1; am L
1992, c 202, §140; am L 1993, c 150, §4 and c 322, §13; am L 1997, c 229, §1;
am L 2009, c 11, §64; am L 2013, c 220, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next